Utah statutes.
77-38a-203.   Restitution determination -- Department of Corrections --
Presentence investigation.
(1) (a)  The department shall prepare a presentence investigation report in
accordance with Subsection 77-18-1(5).  The prosecutor and law enforcement
agency involved shall provide all available victim information to the
department upon request.  The victim impact statement shall:
(i)  identify all victims of the offense;
(ii)  itemize any economic loss suffered by the victim as a result of the
offense;
(iii)  include for each identifiable victim a specific statement of the
recommended amount of complete restitution as defined in Section 77-38a-302,
accompanied by a recommendation from the department regarding the payment by
the defendant of court-ordered restitution with interest as defined in Section
77-38a-302;
(iv)  identify any physical, mental, or emotional injuries suffered by the
victim as a result of the offense, and the seriousness and permanence;
(v)  describe any change in the victim's personal welfare or familial
relationships as a result of the offense;
(vi)  identify any request for mental health services initiated by the victim
or the victim's family as a result of the offense; and
(vii)  contain any other information related to the impact of the offense upon
the victim or the victim's family that the court requires.
(b)  The crime victim shall be responsible to provide to the department upon
request all invoices, bills, receipts, and other evidence of injury, loss of
earnings, and out-of-pocket loss.  The crime victim shall also provide upon
request:
(i)  all documentation and evidence of compensation or reimbursement from
insurance companies or agencies of the state of Utah, any other state, or
federal government received as a direct result of the crime for injury, loss,
earnings, or out-of-pocket loss; and
(ii)  proof of identification, including date of birth, Social Security
number, drivers license number, next of kin, and home and work address and
telephone numbers.
(c)  The inability, failure, or refusal of the crime victim to provide all or
part of the requested information shall result in the court determining
restitution based on the best information available.
(2) (a)  The court shall order the defendant as part of the presentence
investigation to submit to the department any information determined necessary
to be disclosed for the purpose of ascertaining the restitution.
(b)  The willful failure or refusal of the defendant to provide all or part of
the requisite information shall constitute a waiver of any grounds to appeal
or seek future amendment or alteration of the restitution order predicated on
the undisclosed information.
(c)  If the defendant objects to the imposition, amount, or distribution of
the restitution recommended in the presentence investigation, the court shall
set a hearing date to resolve the matter.
(d)  If any party fails to challenge the accuracy of the presentence
investigation report at the time of sentencing, that matter shall be
considered to be waived.
